Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF586.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $50,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $50,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of veterans affairs for grants to Veterans on the Lake for expenses related to retreats for veterans, including therapy, transportation, and activities customized for veterans. new text end